Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [256B.86] PRESCRIPTION DRUG PURCHASING PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of human services must administer and oversee a Minnesota prescription drug purchasing program for prescription drugs provided to program participants. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "program participants" means medical assistance and MinnesotaCare enrollees served under the fee-for-service and managed care delivery systems. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duties of commissioner. new text end new text begin The commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) make prescription drugs available at the lowest possible cost to program participants; new text end new text begin (2) promote health through the purchase and provision of discounted prescription drugs and coordination of comprehensive prescription benefit services for program participants; new text end new text begin (3) maintain a list of prescription drugs recommended as the most effective prescription drugs available at the best possible prices; new text end new text begin (4) administer prescription drug benefits for medical assistance and MinnesotaCare; and new text end new text begin (5) adjudicate pharmacy claims and transmit program prices and other information to pharmacies. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Program authority. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner, in consultation with the Formulary Committee established under section 256B.0625, subdivision 13c, is authorized to: new text end new text begin (1) adopt or develop a preferred drug list; new text end new text begin (2) engage in price negotiations with prescription drug manufacturers, wholesalers, or group purchasing organizations to obtain price discounts and rebates for prescription drugs for program participants; and new text end new text begin (3) develop and manage a drug formulary for the program. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may contract with one or more entities to assist with any of the functions described in paragraph (a) only for plan years 2026, 2027, and 2028. The commissioner must make the final determinations for any function described in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Pharmacies. new text end new text begin The commissioner must set the terms and conditions for pharmacies to participate in the program. The commissioner must enroll all pharmacies participating as medical assistance providers, and any other pharmacy licensed under chapter 151 willing to accept the terms and conditions, in the program. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Federal approval. new text end new text begin The commissioner must seek any necessary federal approvals to implement this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services must notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin EXPANSION OF PRESCRIPTION DRUG PURCHASING PROGRAM.new text end new text begin The commissioner of human services, in consultation with the commissioners of commerce and health, must develop recommendations for expanding the prescription drug purchasing program established under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.86, to include enrollees of health plan companies that have contracted with the commissioner to participate in the program. The recommendations must address the process and terms by which the commissioner would contract with health plan companies to administer prescription drug benefits and develop and manage a drug formulary. The commissioner must present a report with recommendations to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over commerce and health and human services policy and finance by December 15, 2026. new text end